Utah statutes.
32B-5-309.   Ceasing operation.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (8), a retail licensee may not close or cease operation for a period longer than 240 hours, unless:

(a)  the retail licensee notifies the department in writing at least seven days before the day on which the retail licensee closes or ceases operation; and

(b)  the closure or cessation of operation is first approved by the department.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), in the case of emergency closure, a retail licensee shall immediately notify the department by telephone.

(3) (a)  The department may authorize a closure or cessation of operation of a retail licensee for a period not to exceed 60 days.

(b)  The department may extend the initial period an additional 30 days upon:

(i)  written request of the retail licensee; and

(ii)  a showing of good cause.

(4)  A closure or cessation of operation may not exceed a total of 90 days without commission approval.

(5)  A notice required under this section shall include:

(a)  the dates of closure or cessation of operation;

(b)  the reason for the closure or cessation of operation; and

(c)  the date on which the retail licensee will reopen or resume operation.

(6)  Failure of a retail licensee to provide notice and to obtain department approval before closure or cessation of operation results in an automatic forfeiture of:

(a)  the retail license; and

(b)  the unused portion of the retail license fee for the remainder of the retail license year effective immediately.

(7)  Failure of a retail licensee to reopen or resume operation by the approved date results in an automatic forfeiture of:

(a)  the retail license; and

(b)  the unused portion of the retail license fee for the remainder of the retail license year.

(8)  This section does not apply to:

(a)  an on-premise beer retailer who is not a tavern; or

(b)  an airport lounge licensee.

